District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.14

Fee.

The Mayor may charge a reasonable fee for a comfort care order, comfort care bracelet or necklace, and for processing a comfort care order. The fee shall be established by rule.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 15, 48 DCR 27

History